Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.04.214

Qualifying community investments.

(1) An amount equal to ten percent of the aggregate amount invested in real estate in accordance with RCW 30A.04.212 shall be placed in qualifying community investments as defined in subsection (2) of this section.

(2) "Qualifying community investment" means any direct or indirect investment or extension of credit made by a bank in projects or programs designed to develop or redevelop areas in which persons with low or moderate incomes reside, designed to meet the credit needs of such low or moderate-income areas, or that primarily benefits low and moderate-income residents of such areas. The term includes, but is not limited to, any of the following within the state of Washington:

(a) Investments in governmentally insured, guaranteed, subsidized, or otherwise sponsored programs for housing, small farms, or businesses that address the needs of the low and moderate-income areas.

(b) Investments in residential mortgage loans, home improvements loans, housing rehabilitation loans, and small business or small farm loans originated in low and moderate-income areas, or the purchase of such loans originated in low and moderate-income areas.

(c) Investments for the preservation or revitalization of urban or rural communities in low and moderate-income areas.

The term does not include personal installment loans, loans made to purchase, or loans secured by an automobile.

(3) A qualifying community investment made by an entity that wholly owns a bank, is wholly owned by a bank, or is wholly owned by an entity that wholly owns the bank is deemed to have been made by a bank to satisfy the requirements of subsection (1) of this section.

[ 2014 c 37 s 120; 1985 c 329 s 6. Formerly RCW 30.04.214.]

NOTES:

Legislative intent—1985 c 329: See note following RCW 30A.60.010.

Effective date—1985 c 329: See RCW 30A.60.901.

Adoption of rules: RCW 30A.60.030.